California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(k) For purposes of this section, “person” means the feepayer, a member of the feepayer’s family, a corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or another individual or entity acting on behalf of, the feepayer, or another corporation or entity owned or controlled by the feepayer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the feepayer, directly or indirectly.

(l) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 272, Sec. 14) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 98.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Disposition of Proceeds [50157. - 50158.]

50157.

All fees, interest, and penalties imposed, and all amounts of fees required to be paid to the state pursuant to Section 50108 shall be paid to the board in the form of remittances payable to the State Board of Equalization of the State of California. The board shall transmit the payments to the Treasurer to be deposited in the Underground Storage Tank Cleanup Fund in the State Treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 350, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

50158.

The money in the fund shall, upon order of the Controller, be drawn therefrom for refunds under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Disclosure of Information [50159. - 50162.]

50159.

(a) The board shall provide any information obtained under this part to the State Water Resources Control Board, including any information regarding underground storage tanks containing petroleum.

(b) The State Water Resources Control Board and the board may utilize any information obtained pursuant to this part to develop data on underground storage tanks containing petroleum within the state. Notwithstanding Section 50161, the State Water Resources Control Board may make
 this underground storage tank data available to the public.

(c) The board may disclose otherwise confidential information obtained from the lessee or operator of an underground storage tank, or from the person who sold or provided petroleum to the lessee or operator of the underground storage tank, only to the fee payer and only to the extent that this information is necessary for assessment, administration, and verification of the underground storage tank fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 941, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

50160.

A fee payer’s successors, receivers, trustees, executors, administrators, assignees, or guarantors, if directly interested, may be given information regarding the determination of any unpaid fee or the amount of fees, interest, or penalties required to be collected or assessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1366, Sec. 72.   Effective September 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

50161.

Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 50159 and Section 50162, this chapter does not limit or increase public access to information on any aspect of petroleum contained in underground storage tanks made available pursuant to any other state or local law, regulation, or ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

50162.

(a) Upon request from the officials to whom is entrusted the enforcement of the motor fuel tax laws of another government, the board may furnish to those officials any information in the possession of the board that is deemed essential to the enforcement of the motor fuel tax laws. Any information so furnished shall not be used for any purpose other than that for which it was furnished.

(b) The board may furnish to any state or federal agency investigating violations of or
 enforcing any state or federal law related to motor fuels any motor fuel information in the possession of the board that is deemed necessary for the enforcement of those laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 30. FEE COLLECTION PROCEDURES LAW [55001. - 55381.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [55001. - 55004.]

55001.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Fee Collection Procedures Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 177, Sec. 2.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

55002.

“Person” means an individual, trust firm, joint stock company, business concern, corporation, including, but not limited to, a government corporation, partnership, limited liability company, and association. “Person” also includes any city, county, city and county, district, commission, the state or any department, agency, or political subdivision thereof, any interstate body, and the United States and its agencies and instrumentalities to the extent permitted by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 77.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

55003.

“Department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 168.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

55004.

“Feepayer” means any person liable for the payment of the fees collected pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Fee [55021. - 55022.]

55021.

Every person who owes a fee which is subject to this part shall register with the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55022.

The board, whenever it deems necessary to ensure compliance with this part, may require any person subject to this part to place with it any security that the board determines to be reasonable, taking into account the circumstances of that person. The board may sell the security at public auction if it becomes necessary to do so in order to recover any fee or any amount required to be collected, including any interest or penalty due. Notice of the sale shall be served upon the person who placed the security personally or by mail.

If service is made by mail, the notice shall be addressed to the person at his or her address as it appears in the records of the board. Service shall be made at least 30 days prior to the sale in the case of personal service, and at least 40 days prior to the sale in the case of service by mail. Upon any sale, any surplus above the amounts due shall be returned to the person who placed the security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 903, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Determinations [55040. - 55103.]



  ARTICLE 1. Returns and Payments [55040. - 55046.5.]

55040.

A feepayer shall file a return in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

55041.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the board for good cause may extend, for not to exceed one month, the time for making any return or paying any amount required to be paid under this part. The extension may be granted at any time if a request therefor is filed with the board within or prior to the period for which the extension may be granted.

(b) (1) In the case of a disaster, the board, for a period not to exceed three months, may extend the time for making any report or return or paying any fee required under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the board within or before the period for which the extension may be granted. 

(2) For purposes of this section, “disaster” means fire, flood, storm, tidal wave, earthquake, or similar public calamity, whether or not resulting from natural causes.

 (c) Any person to whom an extension is granted shall pay, in addition to the fee, interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5 from the date on which the fee would have been due without the extension until the date of
 payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 257, Sec. 13.   (AB 1559)   Effective September 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

55041.1.

The board may require the payment of the amount due and the filing of returns for periods other than the period or periods set forth in the tax and fee laws administered under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 545, Sec. 5.   (AB 1547)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

55041.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), if the Governor issues a state of emergency proclamation, the department may extend the time, for a period not to exceed three months, for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part for any person in an area identified in the state of emergency proclamation.

(b) If the department makes an extension pursuant to subdivision (a), any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation shall not be required to file a request for the extension. 

(c) The department may make the extension in subdivision (a) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration
 of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 99.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

55042.

(a) Any person who fails to pay any fee, except fees determined by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 55061), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the fee, together with interest on that fee at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the fee became due and payable until the date of payment.

(b) Any person who fails to file a return within
 the time prescribed for filing the return shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the fee with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(c) The penalties imposed by this section shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the fee for which the return is required for any one return.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

55042.5.

(a) If the department finds, taking into account all facts and circumstances, that it is inequitable to compute interest at the modified adjusted rate per month or fraction thereof, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6591.5, interest shall be computed at the modified adjusted daily rate from the date on which the fee was due until the date of payment, if all of the following occur:

(1) The payment of the fee was made one business day after the date the fee was due.

(2) The person was granted relief from all penalties that applied to that fee payment.

(3) The person files a request for an adjustment.

(b) For purposes of this section, “modified adjusted daily rate” means the modified adjusted rate per annum, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 6591.5, determined on a daily basis by dividing the modified adjusted rate per annum by 365.

(c) For purposes of this section, “business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or any day designated as a state holiday.

(d) This section does not apply to any payment made pursuant to a deficiency determination, a determination where a return has not been filed, or a jeopardy determination issued by the
 department.

(e) This section only applies to electronic payments of fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 169.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

55044.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the penalty provided by Sections 34013, 55042, 55050, and 55086.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the department a statement, under penalty of perjury, setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the penalty for any
 person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b). 

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(d) The department shall establish criteria that provide for efficient resolution of requests for relief pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 100.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

55045.

(a) If the board finds that a person’s failure to make a timely report or payment is due to the person’s reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, the person may be relieved of the fees imposed or administered under this part and any penalty or interest added thereto.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person’s failure to make a timely report or payment shall be considered to be due to reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, only if the board finds
 that all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person requested in writing that the board advise him or her whether a particular activity or transaction is subject to the fee under this part. The specific facts and circumstances of the activity or transaction shall be fully described in the request.

(2) The board responded in writing to the person regarding the written request for advice, stating whether or not the described activity or transaction is subject to the fee, or stating the conditions under which the activity or transaction is subject to the fee.

(3) The liability for fees applied to a particular activity or transaction which occurred before either of the following:

(A) Before the board rescinded or modified the advice so given,
 by sending written notice to the person of the rescinded or modified advice.

(B) Before a change in statutory or constitutional law, a change in the board’s regulations, or a final decision of a court, which renders the board’s earlier written advice no longer valid.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board all of the following:

(1) A copy of the person’s written request to the board and a copy of the board’s written advice.

(2) A statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based.

(3) Any other information which the board may require.

(d) Only
 the person making the written request shall be entitled to rely on the board’s written advice to that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55045.1.

(a) Under regulations prescribed by the board, if: (1) A tax or fee liability under this part was understated by a failure to file a return required to be filed under this part, by the omission of an amount properly includable therein, or by erroneous deductions or credits claimed on a return, and the understatement of tax or fee
 liability is attributable to one spouse; or any amount of the tax or fee reported on a return was unpaid and the nonpayment of the reported tax or fee liability is attributable to one spouse, or any amount of the fee due on a notice of determination or similar billing document used for collection of the fee was unpaid and the nonpayment of the fee liability is attributable to one spouse. (2) The other spouse establishes that he or she did not know of, and had no reason to know of, that understatement or nonpayment. (3) Taking into account whether or not the other spouse significantly benefited directly or indirectly from the understatement or the nonpayment and taking into account all other facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other
 spouse liable for the deficiency in the tax or fee attributable to that understatement or nonpayment,then the other spouse shall be relieved of liability for the tax or fee (including interest, penalties, and other amounts) to the extent that the liability is attributable to that understatement or nonpayment of tax or fee.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of the spouse to whom items of understatement or nonpayment are attributable shall be made without regard to community property laws.

(c) This section shall apply to all calendar months, quarters, or years subject to the provisions of this part, but shall not apply to any calendar month, quarter, or year that is more than five years from the final date on the board-issued determination or similar billing document for collection of the fee, five
 years from the return due date for nonpayment on a return, or one year from the first contact with the spouse making a claim under this section; or that has been closed by res judicata, whichever is later.

(d) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), “reason to know” means whether or not a reasonably prudent person would have had reason to know of the understatement or nonpayment.

(e) For purposes of this section, with respect to a failure to file a return or an omission of an item from the return, “attributable to one spouse” may be determined by whether a spouse rendered substantial service as a taxpayer or feepayer engaged in an activity or transaction that is subject to a tax or fee administered under this part to which the understatement or nonpayment is attributable. If neither spouse rendered substantial services as a taxpayer or feepayer, then the attribution of
 applicable items of understatement or nonpayment shall be treated as community property. An erroneous deduction or credit shall be attributable to the spouse who caused that deduction or credit to be entered on the return.

(f) Under procedures prescribed by the board, if, taking into account all the facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for any unpaid tax or fee or any deficiency (or any portion of either) attributable to any item for which relief is not available under subdivision (a), the board may relieve the other spouse of that liability.

(g) For purposes of this section, registered domestic partners, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, have the same rights, protections, and benefits as provided by this section, and are subject to the same responsibilities, obligations, and duties as imposed by this section, as are granted to and
 imposed upon spouses.

(h) The relief provided by this section shall apply retroactively to liabilities arising prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section applicable retroactively as prescribed in subd. (h) and clarified in Sec. 60 of Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------

55046.

(a) The board, in its discretion, may relieve all or any part of the interest imposed on a person by this part where the failure to pay fees is due in whole or in part to an unreasonable error or delay by an employee of the board acting in his or her official capacity.

(b) For purposes of this section, an error or delay shall be deemed to have occurred only if no significant aspect of the error or delay is attributable to an act of, or a failure to act by, the
 feepayer.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based and any other information which the board may require.

(d) The board may grant relief only for interest imposed on fee liabilities that arise during taxable periods commencing on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

55046.5.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment was due to a disaster, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of interest provided by Sections 55041, 55042, 55050, and 55061.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any person seeking to be relieved of the interest shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the interest for any person in an area
 identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 101.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.1. Payment by Electronic Funds Transfer [55050. - 55053.]

55050.

(a) Any person whose estimated fee liability under this part averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, as determined by the board pursuant to methods of calculation prescribed by the board, shall remit amounts due by an electronic funds transfer under procedures prescribed by the board.

(b) Any person whose estimated fee liability under this part averages less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per month may elect to remit
 amounts due by electronic funds transfer with the approval of the board.

(c) Any person remitting amounts due pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall perform electronic funds transfer in compliance with the due dates prescribed for the payment of the fee. Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(d) Any person remitting fees by electronic funds transfer shall, on or before the due date of the remittance, file a return for the preceding reporting period in the form and manner prescribed by the board. Any person who fails to
 timely file the required return shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of fees, exclusive of prepayments, with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(e) Any person required to remit fees pursuant to this article who remits those fees by means other than appropriate electronic funds transfer shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the fees incorrectly remitted.

(f) Any person who fails to pay any fee to the state or any amount of fee required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 55061) within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the fee or amount of fee, in addition to the fee or amount of fee, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the fee or the
 amount of fee required to be collected became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(g) In determining whether a person’s estimated fee liability averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, the board may consider returns filed pursuant to this part and any other information in the board’s possession.

(h) The penalties imposed by subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the fees due, exclusive of prepayments, for any one return. Any person remitting fees by electronic funds transfer shall be subject to the penalties under this section and not Section 55042.

(i) The board shall promulgate regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code for purposes of implementing this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 21.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

55051.

If the board finds that a person’s failure to make payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with board procedures is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that person shall be relieved of the penalty provided in subdivision (e) of Section 55050. Any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which he or she bases
 his or her claim for relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

55052.

(a) “Electronic funds transfer” means any transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape, so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an account. Electronic funds transfers shall be accomplished by an automated clearinghouse debit, an automated clearinghouse credit, or by Federal Reserve Wire Transfer (Fedwire).

(b) “Automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established in agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries between banks or bank accounts and which authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between these banks or bank accounts.

(c) “Automated clearinghouse debit” means a transaction in which the state, through its designated depository bank, originates an automated clearinghouse transaction debiting the person’s bank account and crediting the state’s bank account for the amount of the fee. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse debit transaction shall be paid by the state.

(d) “Automated clearinghouse credit” means an automated clearinghouse transaction in which the person
 through his or her own bank, originates an entry crediting the state’s bank account and debiting his or her own bank account. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse credit transaction charged to the state shall be paid by the person originating the credit.

(e) “Fedwire transfer” means any transaction originated by a person and utilizing the national electronic payment system to transfer funds through the federal reserve banks, when that person debits his or her own bank account and credits the state’s bank account. Electronic funds transfers pursuant to Section 55050 may be made by Fedwire only if payment cannot, for good cause, be made according to subdivision (a), and the use of Fedwire is preapproved by the board. Banking costs incurred for the Fedwire transaction charged to the person and to the state shall be paid by the person originating the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

55053.

(a) Any return, declaration, statement, or other document required to be made under this part that is filed using electronic media shall be filed and authenticated pursuant to any method or form the board may prescribe.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any return, declaration, statement, or other document otherwise required to be signed that is filed by the taxpayer using electronic media in a form as required by the board shall be deemed to be a signed, valid original
 document, including upon reproduction to paper form by the board.

(c) Electronic media includes, but is not limited to, computer modem, magnetic media, optical disk, facsimile machine, or telephone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 543, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Deficiency Determinations [55061. - 55064.]

55061.

(a) If the department is dissatisfied with the return filed or the amount of the fee paid to the state by any feepayer, or if no return has been filed or no payment of the fee has been made to the state by a feepayer, the department may compute and determine the amount to be paid, based upon any information available to it. In addition, where the department is authorized to collect a fee for another state agency, or where the department is authorized to collect a fee under circumstances where the feepayer is not required to file a return, the department may issue a notice of determination or similar billing document for collection of the fee. One or more additional determinations may be made of the amount of the fee due for one, or for more than one period. The amount of the fee so
 determined shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date the amount of the fee, or any portion thereof, became due and payable until the date of payment. In making a determination, the department may offset overpayments for a period or periods against underpayments for another period or periods and against the interest and penalties on the underpayments.

(b) If any part of the deficiency for which a determination of an additional amount due is found to have been occasioned by negligence or intentional disregard of this part or authorized regulations, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added, plus interest as provided in subdivision (a).

(c) If any part of the deficiency for which a determination of an additional amount due is found to be occasioned by fraud or
 an intent to evade this part or authorized regulations, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added, plus interest as provided in subdivision (a).

(d) The department shall give to the feepayer written notice of its determination. The notice shall be served in one of the following manners:

(1) By placing the notice in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the feepayer at their address as it appears in the records of the department. Service made pursuant to this paragraph shall be deemed complete at the time of the deposit of the notice in a United States Post Office, or a mailbox, sub-post office, substation, or mail chute, or other facility regularly maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service without extension of time for any reason.

(2) By personally
 delivering the notice to the person to be served. Service made pursuant to this paragraph shall be deemed complete at the time of delivery. Personal service to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person designated in the Code of Civil Procedure to be served for the corporation with summons and complaint in a civil action.

(3) (A) By delivering the notice electronically via secure transmission when either of the following applies:

(i) The feepayer requests the notice of determination to be sent electronically via secure transmission.

(ii) The department has evidence that the feepayer no longer receives mail at the address of record and has previously provided an address for electronic mail.

(B) Service provided
 pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be deemed complete at the time the department electronically transmits the notice via the feepayer’s secure web portal, without extension of time for any reason.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 111.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

55062.

Except in the case of fraud, intent to evade this part, authorized rules and regulations, or failure to make a return, every notice of a determination of an additional amount due shall be served within three years after the date when the amount should have been paid or the return was due, or within three years after the return was filed, whichever period expires later. In the case of failure to make a return, the notice of determination shall be served within eight years after the date the return was due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 112.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

55063.

In the case of a deficiency arising under this part during the lifetime of a decedent, a notice of deficiency determination shall be served within four months after written request therefor, in the form required by the department, by the fiduciary of the estate or trust or by any other person liable for the fee or any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 113.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

55064.

If before the expiration of the time prescribed in Section 55062 for serving a notice of deficiency determination the feepayer has consented in writing to service of the notice after that time, the notice may be served at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 114.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Redeterminations [55081. - 55087.]

55081.

Any person from whom an amount is determined to be due under Article 2 (commencing with Section 55061), or any person directly interested, may petition for a redetermination thereof within 30 days after service upon him or her of notice of the determination. If a petition for redetermination is not filed within the 30–day period, the amount determined to be due becomes final at the expiration thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55082.

Every petition for redetermination shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded. The petition may be amended to state additional grounds at any time prior to the date on which the board issues its order or decision upon the petition for redetermination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55083.

If a petition for redetermination is filed within the 30-day period, the board shall reconsider the amount determined to be due, and if the person has so requested in his or her petition, the board shall grant him or her an oral hearing and shall give him or her 10 days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing. The board may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55084.

The board may decrease or increase the amount of the determination before it becomes final, but the amount may be increased only if a claim for the increase is asserted by the board at or before the hearing. Unless the 25-percent penalty imposed by subdivision (c) of Section 55061 applies to the amount of the determination as originally made or as increased, the claim for increase must be asserted within eight years after the date the return for the period for which the increase is asserted was due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55085.

The order or decision of the board upon a petition for redetermination shall become final 30 days after service upon the petitioner of notice thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55086.

All amounts determined to be due by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 55061) are due and payable at the time they become final, and if not paid when due and payable, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount determined to be due shall be added to the amount due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

55087.

Any notice required by this article shall be served in the same manner as prescribed for service of notice by subdivision (d) of Section 55061.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 115.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Jeopardy Determinations [55101. - 55103.]

55101.

If the board believes that the collection of any amount of the fee will be jeopardized by delay, it shall thereupon make a determination of the amount of the fee due, noting that fact upon the determination, and the amount of the fee shall be immediately due and payable. If the amount of the fee, interest, and penalty specified in the jeopardy determination is not paid, or a petition for redetermination is not filed, within 10 days after the service upon the feepayer of notice of determination, the determination becomes final, and the delinquency penalty and
 interest provided in Section 55042 shall be attached to the amount of the fee specified therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 527, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

55102.

The feepayer against whom a jeopardy determination is made may file a petition for redetermination thereof, pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 55081), with the department within 10 days after the service upon the feepayer of notice of the determination, but they shall, within the 10-day period, deposit with the department any security that it deems necessary to ensure compliance with the provisions of this part. The security may be sold by the department at public sale if it becomes necessary to do so in order to recover any amount due under this part. Notice of the sale may be served upon the person who deposited the security in the same manner as prescribed for service of notice by Section 55061. Upon any such sale, the surplus, if any, above the amount due under this part shall be returned to the
 person who deposited the security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 116.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

55103.
